Utah statutes.
70C-1-102.   Purposes -- Rules of construction.

(1)  This title shall be liberally construed and applied to promote its underlying purposes and policies.

(2)  The underlying purposes and policies of this title are:

(a)  to further consumer understanding of the terms of credit transactions and to foster competition among suppliers of consumer credit so that consumers may obtain credit at reasonable cost;

(b)  to prohibit certain unfair practices; and

(c)  to avoid the duplication of laws and regulations pertaining to consumer credit between state and federal authorities and to supplement applicable federal laws and regulations.

